Massachusetts, session 194th, H5347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the Town of Bourne may grant 1 additional license for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to
Sea State Foods, LLC, d/b/a Cataumet Fish, located at 1360 Route 28A, Cataumet, in the town
of Bourne. The license granted pursuant to this act shall be subject to all of said chapter 138
except said section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this act to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location
if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a
letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been
paid.
of 2

(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act or any such
license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of the
legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority which may,
within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same location and
under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall dissolve.
(d) The license granted under this act shall be issued within 1 year after the effective date
of this act; provided, however, that if the license is originally granted within that time period, it
may be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2